Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.062

Salary of judges.

The annual salary of the judges of the court of appeals shall be established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials. No salary warrant may be issued to any judge until the judge files with the state treasurer an affidavit that no matter referred to the judge for opinion or decision has been uncompleted for more than six months.

[ 1986 c 155 s 5; 1984 c 258 s 402.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: RCW 43.03.305.